Maryland, session 2026, HB0727.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Alcoholic Beverages and Cannabis
11–102.
This title applies only in Anne Arundel County.
11–1009.
(a) There is a Class C (veterans’ organization) license.
(b) The Board shall issue the license for use by a local unit of a nationwide
nonprofit organization or club that:
– 1 –

Ch. 819 2026 LAWS OF MARYLAND
(1) is composed only of members who served in the [armed forces of the
United States in a war in which the United States has been engaged] UNIFORMED
SERVICES;
(2) has a charter from a national veterans’ organization that was granted
before the application for the license was made;
(3) has a bona fide membership of at least 100 individuals and dues of at
least $5 per year per individual; and
(4) operates for its members and meets in a clubhouse principally used for
its members.
(c) (1) Subject to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the license authorizes the
license holder to sell beer, wine, and liquor at retail at the place described in the license for
on–premises consumption, including:
(i) during an event held on the licensed premises; and
(ii) to a member of the veterans’ organization or a guest of the
member.
(2) If the license holder hosts an event for an outside group, the outside
group shall obtain a Class C per diem beer, wine, and liquor license from the Board.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.
Approved by the Governor, May 26, 2026.
– 2 –